Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1143.
do enact as follows:AB1143,11Section 1. 134.83 of the statutes is created to read:AB1143,2,42134.83 Service charges by cooperatives for multiple-unit residential 3property. (1) In this section, “cooperative” means a cooperative association 4organized under ch. 185.AB1143,2,95(2) A cooperative that furnishes electricity, water, gas, or sewer service at 6retail to a multiple-unit residential property shall provide to a residential tenant of 7that property, upon request, a copy of the charges for the property. The cooperative 8may require that the tenant produce evidence of an active rental agreement in 9order to receive the copy of the charges.AB1143,210Section 2. 196.637 of the statutes is created to read:AB1143,3,411196.637 Utility charges for multiple-unit residential property. A 12public utility that furnishes electricity, water, gas, or sewer service at retail to a 1multiple-unit residential property shall provide to a residential tenant of that 2property, upon request, a copy of the charges for the property. The public utility 3may require that the tenant produce evidence of an active rental agreement in 4order to receive the copy of the charges.AB1143,35Section 3. 704.065 of the statutes is created to read:AB1143,3,76704.065 Utility service charges. (1) In this section, “utility service” means 7the furnishing of electricity, water, gas, or sewer service.AB1143,3,158(2) If a residential rental agreement does not include all utility service 9charges in the rent, a landlord shall disclose that fact to a prospective tenant before 10entering into a rental agreement or accepting any earnest money or security 11deposit from the prospective tenant. A landlord’s disclosure under this subsection 12shall be in writing, shall identify each utility service for which a charge is not 13included in the rent, and shall clearly explain the structure by which the 14prospective tenant would be expected to pay for any utility service charged to the 15tenant.AB1143,3,2016(3) (a) If a residential rental agreement is for a dwelling unit that is not 17separately metered from common areas or other premises in a building and the 18rental agreement does not include all utility service charges in the rent, the 19landlord shall clearly disclose in the rental agreement the method by which charges 20for each utility service not included in the rent will be allocated.AB1143,4,221(b) A landlord’s method of allocation of utility service charges under par. (a) 22may divide a utility service charge on the basis of the number of individuals 23residing in a dwelling unit in the building for which the landlord is charged for the 24utility service. A landlord may not allocate a charge for a utility service by dividing 1the charge on the basis of the number of dwelling units or premises in the building 2for which the landlord is charged for the utility service.AB1143,4,123(4) If a landlord charges a tenant for a utility service in an amount that is 4subject to variation during different periods of the residential rental agreement and 5the charges do not violate rules promulgated by the public service commission, the 6tenant may request that the landlord provide to the tenant a written and detailed 7accounting of how the landlord calculated the amount charged to the tenant for the 8utility service in any period governed by the rental agreement. A request made 9under this subsection may be made by a tenant at any time during the tenant’s 10tenancy. A landlord shall respond to a tenant’s request for information under this 11subsection by providing a written and detailed accounting of the charge identified 12by the tenant within 14 calendar days of the tenant’s request.AB1143,4,2013(5) If a residential rental agreement does not include all utility service 14charges in the rent and the landlord allocates a charge for a utility service among 15the tenants in a building, the landlord shall ensure that a tenant has the 16opportunity to pay the charge for the utility service in the same individual 17transaction in which the tenant makes the tenant’s rent payment, and neither the 18landlord nor any of its affiliates may charge a separate fee for the processing of the 19utility service payment. Nothing in this section requires a landlord to act when a 20tenant directly pays a utility for the provision of a utility service.AB1143,4,2321(6) A landlord may not charge a tenant for a utility service unless the 22landlord’s charge reflects the cost incurred by the landlord resulting from the 23landlord’s obligation to the utility furnishing the utility service.AB1143,5,224(7) (a) A landlord that violates sub. (2) or (3) may not charge a tenant to whom 1the violation applies for any utility service during the period of the residential 2rental agreement.AB1143,5,63(b) If a landlord fails to respond to a tenant’s request in violation of sub. (4), 4the tenant may withhold, and is not obligated to make, future utility service 5payments to the landlord until the landlord provides a written and detailed 6accounting of the charge identified by the tenant in the tenant’s request.AB1143,47Section 4. 704.145 of the statutes is created to read:AB1143,5,98704.145 Notice of utility charges. A residential rental agreement shall 9include the following notice in the agreement or in an addendum to the agreement:AB1143,5,1010NOTICE OF UTILITY CHARGESAB1143,5,1911As provided under s. 704.065 of the Wisconsin Statutes, if a landlord charges 12a residential tenant for a utility service in an amount that is subject to variation 13during different periods of the rental agreement, a tenant may request that the 14landlord provide to the tenant a written and detailed accounting of how the 15landlord calculated the amount charged for a utility service. A landlord is required 16to respond to the request by providing a written and detailed accounting of the 17charge identified by the tenant within 14 calendar days of the tenant’s request. A 18tenant is advised that this notice is only a summary of the tenant’s rights and the 19specific language of the statutes and administrative code governs in all instances.AB1143,5,2020